Massachusetts, session 194th, S1835.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9C½ of chapter 32B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 6, after the figure ”26,” the following
words:- and such children who are over the age of 19 and physically or mentally incapacitated
from earnings.
SECTION 2. Said section 9C½ of said chapter 32B, as so appearing, is further amended
by striking out, in line 7, the following words:- continue to
SECTION 3. Said section 9C½ of said chapter 32B, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 15, the words “100 per cent of the premium” and inserting in
of 2

place thereof the following words:- a premium at the same rate as retirees of the governmental
unit from time to time as part of the total cost.
of 2